Utah statutes.
59-2-1312.   Examination of books of county officers by state officers.

The state auditor, any member of the commission, or any person designated by the commission may examine the books of any county officer charged with the collection and receipt of state taxes.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

